Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2127.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 12-16,124 is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-16,124. (a) No city or county shall adopt or enforce any ordinance,
resolution or regulation, and no agent of any city or county shall take any
administrative action, governing the requirement of fees, licenses or
permits for, the commerce in or the sale, purchase, transfer, ownership,
storage, carrying, transporting or taxation of firearms or ammunition, or
any component or combination thereof.
(b) Any ordinance, resolution or regulation prohibited by subsection
(a) that was adopted prior to July 1, 2015, shall be null and void.
(c) Nothing in this section shall:
(1) Prohibit a city or county from adopting and enforcing any
ordinance, resolution or regulation relating to the personnel policies of
such city or county and the carrying of firearms by employees of such city
or county, except that any such ordinance, resolution or regulation shall
comply with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-7c01 et seq., and amendments
thereto;
(2) prohibit a city or county from adopting any ordinance, resolution
or regulation pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7c20, and amendments thereto;
(3) prohibit a law enforcement officer, as defined in K.S.A. 22-2202,
and amendments thereto, from acting within the scope of such officer's
duties; or
(4) prohibit a city or county from levying and collecting any retailers'
sales tax on the sale of firearms, ammunition or any component or
combination thereof as authorized by K.S.A. 12-189, and amendments
thereto; or
(5) prohibit a city or county from adopting and enforcing any
ordinance, resolution or regulation relating to the sale or purchase of
firearms or ammunition, or any component or combination thereof, within
any building owned by such city or county.

HB 2127 2
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 12-16,124 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.